Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 9
REGIONAL HEALTH CONNECTOR
WORKFORCE PROGRAM

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

23-21-901. Regional health connector workforce program - creation - school of medicine.

There is created in the university of Colorado school of medicine the regional health connector workforce program, referred to in this section as the "program". The program shall:

Educate health-care providers on evidence-based and evidence-informed therapies and techniques to enable health-care providers to incorporate such practices in their work and to improve community health;

Provide support and assistance to primary care providers as a link between primary care services, behavioral health services, public health services, and community agencies to improve community health and health care, including attention to behavioral health needs;

Assist primary care practices and community agencies in connecting patients with mental health or substance use disorders to support and treatment options;

Educate health-care providers about preventive medicine, health promotion, chronic disease management, and behavioral health services; and

Provide clear information to providers and community members regarding COVID-19 prevention, treatment, and vaccines.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2363, § 6, effective June 28.